Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2489.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of ceiling fans, box fans, fan mounting kits and other accessories during the exclusion period to a purchaser for nonbusiness use. The department shall 12345678910111213141516171819202122 publish a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website of all items exempt from sales tax for the duration of the exclusion period and information to give guidance to the public on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause:"Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.(78) The sale at retail or use of paper or plastic plates, eating utensils, cups and napkins designed for single use during the exclusion period to a purchaser for nonbusiness use. The department shall publish a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website of all items exempt from sales tax for the duration of the exclusion period and information to give guidance to the public on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause:"Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.(79) The sale at retail or use of swimsuits, sunscreen, sunglasses and other accessories during the exclusion period to a purchaser for nonbusiness use. The department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of all items exempt from sales tax for the duration of the exclusion period. The department shall publish a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the 20260HB2489PN3365 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause:"Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2489PN3365 - 3 - 12345678